California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(2) (A) Establish a procedure for applicants to file with the California Film Commission a written application, on a form jointly prescribed by the California Film Commission and the Franchise Tax Board for the allocation of the tax credit. The application shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following information:

(i) The budget for the motion picture production.

(ii) The number of production days.

(iii) A financing plan for the production.

(iv) The diversity of the workforce employed by the applicant, including, but not limited to, the ethnic and racial makeup of the individuals employed by the applicant during the production of the qualified motion picture, to the extent possible.

(v) The amount of qualified wages the applicant expects to pay to qualified individuals.

(vi) The amount of tax credit the applicant computes the qualified motion picture will receive, applying the applicable credit percentages described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a).

(vii) A statement establishing that the tax credit described in this section is a
 significant factor in the applicant’s choice of location for the qualified motion picture. The statement shall include information about whether the qualified motion picture is at risk of not being filmed or specify the jurisdiction or jurisdictions in which the qualified motion picture will be located in the absence of the tax credit. The statement shall be signed by an officer or executive of the applicant.

(viii) The applicant’s written policy against unlawful harassment, including, but not limited to, sexual harassment, which includes procedures for reporting and investigating harassment claims, a phone number for an individual who will be responsible for receiving harassment claims, and a statement that the company will not retaliate against an individual who reports harassment. The applicant shall also indicate how the policy will be distributed to employees and include a summary of education training resources, including the prohibition
 against, and prevention and correction of, sexual harassment and remedies available.

(ix) If applicable, summary of the applicant’s voluntary programs to increase the representation of minorities and women in the job classifications that are not included in qualified wages as set forth in clause (iv) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (22) of subdivision (b) and information about how these programs are publicized to interested parties. The officer or executive referenced in clause (xi) who is signing the statement shall provide additional information about these programs, if needed and upon request, to the California Film Commission.

(x) Any other information deemed relevant by the California Film Commission or the Franchise Tax Board.

(B) Establish criteria, consistent with the requirements of this section, for
 allocating tax credits.

(C) Determine and designate applicants who meet the requirements of this section.

(D) For purposes of allocating the credit amounts subject to the categories described in subdivision (i) in any fiscal year, the California Film Commission shall do all of the following:

(i) For each allocation date and for each category, list each applicant from highest to lowest according to the jobs ratio as computed by the California Film Commission.

(ii) Subject to the applicable credit percentage, allocate the credit to each applicant according to the highest jobs ratio, working down the list, until the credit amount is exhausted.

(iii) (I) Pursuant to
 regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision (e), the California Film Commission may increase the jobs ratio by up to 25 percent if a qualified motion picture increases economic activity in California according to criteria developed by the California Film Commission that would include, but not be limited to, those factors as, the amount of the production and postproduction spending in California, the employment of scoring musicians in California, and other criteria measuring economic impact in California as determined by the California Film Commission. The criteria developed by the California Film Commission shall not assess fewer points for the employment of scoring musicians in California than any other category within the jobs ratio bonus.

(II) For qualified motion pictures that are described in clause (i) of subparagraph (G) of paragraph (8) of subdivision (k) of Section 17053.98 and Section 23698, the jobs ratio shall be equal to the
 product of the jobs ratio calculated in paragraph (8) of subdivision (b) and 133 percent.

(iv) (I) Notwithstanding any other law, any television series, relocating television series, or any new television series based on a pilot for a new television series that has been approved and issued a credit allocation by the California Film Commission under this section or Section 17053.85, 17053.95, 17053.98, 17053.98.1, 23685, 23695, or 23698 shall be issued a credit for each subsequent season, for the life of that television series whenever credits are allocated within a fiscal year.

(II) Notwithstanding subclause (I), a recurring television series that does not request a credit allocation within 18 months from the date of completion of principal photography of the previous season is deemed to have waived the credit allocation guarantee provided by this clause and
 must reapply for a credit allocation. The California Film Commission may by regulation determine the appropriate priority to be given in a reapplication process for a recurring series reapplying pursuant to this subclause.

(III) The California Film Commission shall limit the amount of credits any recurring television series, including a recurring television series under subdivision (k) of Section 23698, receives in a subsequent season to no more than the recurring television allocation amount.

(IV) In the event that insufficient tax credits are available to fund all recurring television series pursuant to this clause for any fiscal year or in the event the California Film Commission projects, in collaboration with the Department of Finance, that there will be insufficient tax credits available to fund all recurring television series in either of the subsequent two fiscal years,
 the California Film Commission shall make the following adjustments in the order given until the shortfall, or any projected shortfall for the two subsequent fiscal years, for recurring television series is eliminated:

(V) (ia) Notwithstanding clause (iii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (i), the California Film Commission may redirect up to 100 percent of the credit amounts allocated to the relocating television series category to recurring television series for that fiscal year until the shortfall or projected shortfall is eliminated.

(ib) Notwithstanding clause (iv) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (i), the California Film Commission may redirect up to 100 percent of the credit amounts allocated to a new television series to recurring television series for that fiscal year until the shortfall or projected shortfall is
 eliminated.

(ic) Notwithstanding clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (i), the California Film Commission may redirect up to 100 percent of the credit allocations from the features category to the recurring television series category for that fiscal year until the shortfall is eliminated.

(id) Allocate up to 25 percent of total credit allocations that would otherwise be allocated in the 2029–30 fiscal year to recurring television series in the current fiscal year until the shortfall is eliminated. Any amounts transferred for allocation in the current fiscal year shall be subtracted from the amount allowed to be allocated in the 2029–30 fiscal year as specified in subdivision (i). Notwithstanding paragraph (3), the credit allocations that are subtracted from the 2029–30 fiscal year shall not be certified until July 1, 2030, or later.

(ie) The California Film Commission shall consult with the qualified taxpayers who are producing the recurring television series for purposes of negotiating a minimally impactful reduction in the amount of credits awarded to each recurring television series for that fiscal year until the shortfall is eliminated.

(E) Subject to the annual cap and the allocation credit amounts based on categories described in subdivision (i), allocate an aggregate amount of credits under this section and Section 17053.98.1, and allocate any carryover of unallocated or unused credits from prior years and Sections 17053.85, 17053.95, 17053.98, 23685, 23695, and 23698 and the amount of any credits reduced pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d).

(3) Certify tax credits allocated to qualified taxpayers and do all of the following:

(A) Establish a verification procedure to do both of the following:

(i) Update the information in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g), including, but not limited to, the amounts of qualified expenditures paid or incurred by the applicant.

(ii) Ensure that the final safety evaluation report required pursuant to Section 9152 of the Labor Code has been submitted.

(B) Establish audit requirements that shall be satisfied before a credit certificate may be issued by the California Film Commission.

(C) Issue a credit certificate to a qualified taxpayer upon completion of the qualified motion picture reflecting the credit amount allocated after qualified expenditures have been
 verified and the jobs ratio computed under this section. The amount of credit shown on the credit certificate shall not exceed the amount of credit allocated to that qualified taxpayer pursuant to this section.

(D) (i) Notwithstanding any other law, the California Film Commission shall certify a credit amount equal to 96 percent of the total credit allocated to the qualified taxpayer, unless the qualified taxpayer chooses to submit a diversity workplan and the California Film Commission determines that the qualified taxpayer has met or made a good-faith effort to meet the diversity goals in its diversity workplan, pursuant to clause (ii).

(ii) The California Film Commission shall certify an additional credit amount equal to 4 percent of the total credit allocated to the qualified taxpayer if a qualified taxpayer submits to the California Film Commission, in
 the form and manner required by the commission, all of the following:

(I) A diversity workplan within 30 days after receiving a credit allocation letter. The workplan shall be consistent with the diversity workplan checklist to address diversity and be broadly reflective of California’s population in terms of race, ethnicity, gender, disability status, and veteran status, and shall include all of the following:

(ia) A statement of the diversity goals the motion picture will seek to achieve in terms of qualified wages.

(ib) A statement of the diversity goals the motion picture will seek to achieve for individuals whose wages are excluded from qualified wages.

(ic) A plan of what strategies the motion picture will employ to achieve the goals in this
 subclause and subclause (II).

(id) Other requirements as the California Film Commission shall determine by regulation.

(II) An interim assessment on the qualified taxpayer’s efforts to meet the diversity workplan prior to the commencement of principal photography. Upon review pursuant to a procedure prescribed in regulations, the California Film Commission shall determine whether the interim assessment indicates that the qualified motion picture is making a good-faith effort to meet the goals of the diversity workplan and shall notify the qualified motion picture of its findings.

(III) A final diversity assessment that includes information about how the project met or made a good-faith effort to meet the diversity workplan, including, but not limited to, aggregate data voluntarily self-reported by individuals whose
 wages are included in qualified wages and individuals whose wages are excluded from qualified wages, with regard to their race, ethnicity, gender, disability status, veteran status, and ZIP Code.

(iii) The California Film Commission, in consultation with the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development, shall establish guidelines to evaluate diversity workplans as described in this subparagraph. The guidelines shall be posted on the California Film Commission’s internet website.

(iv) The California Film Commission shall approve or reject the diversity workplan of an applicant, to the extent allowed by federal and state law.

(v) This subparagraph shall not apply to an independent film with qualified expenditures of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) or less.

(vi) The requirements of this subparagraph shall not apply to a recurring television series receiving an allocation of credits under this section pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (G) of paragraph (8) of subdivision (k) of Section 17053.98 or Section 23698 and fulfills the diversity workplan and report requirements pursuant to subdivision (k) of Section 17053.98 or Section 23698.

(vii) A qualified motion picture described in subparagraph (D) of paragraph (8) of subdivision (k) of Section 17053.98 or Section 23698 that applies for an allocation of credits under this section shall be subject to the requirements of this subparagraph and not those of clause (iv) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (k) of Sections 17053.98 and 23698 and paragraph (3) of subdivision (k) of Sections 17053.98 and 23698.

(4) Obtain, when possible, the following information from applicants that do not receive an allocation of credit:

(A) Whether the qualified motion picture that was the subject of the application was completed.

(B) If completed, in which state or foreign jurisdiction was the primary principal photography completed.

(C) Whether the applicant received any financial incentives from the state or foreign jurisdiction to make the qualified motion picture in that location.

(5) Provide the Legislative Analyst’s Office, upon request, any or all application materials or any other materials received from, or submitted by, applicants for which a credit allocation decision has been made, including, but not limited to, applicants that did not receive a
 credit allocation. Materials provided to the Legislative Analyst’s Office shall be in electronic format when available and include, but not be limited to, information provided pursuant to subclause (I) to (III), inclusive, of clause (ii) of subparagraph (D) of paragraph (3).

(6) The information provided to the California Film Commission pursuant to this section shall constitute confidential tax information for purposes of Article 2 (commencing with Section 19542) of Chapter 7 of Part 10.2.

(7) (A) Notwithstanding any other law, on or after July 1, 2030, the California Film Commission may allocate, pursuant to this section, any previously allocated credits not certified that have not previously been added to credit amounts available for allocation under this section or a successor section or sections.

(B) For purposes of this section, “previously allocated credits not certified” means either of the following:

(i) Credits allocated under paragraph (1) for which the qualified taxpayer to which the credit amounts were originally allocated has notified the California Film Commission in writing that the qualified taxpayer will not request certification for the allocated credits.

(ii) The difference between the amount of credits allocated under paragraph (1) to a qualified taxpayer and the amount of credits the California Film Commission certified, for that qualified taxpayer. For purposes of calculating the difference, the California Film Commission shall not consider any credit amounts for which the qualified taxpayer notifies the California Film Commission under clause (i).

(8) Notwithstanding any other
 law, on or after July 1, 2030, the California Film Commission may allocate, pursuant to this section, any credit amounts described in subparagraphs (B) and (E) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (i) that have not previously been added to credit amounts available for allocation under this section or a successor section or sections.

(9) The California Film Commission shall submit a report to the Legislature, on an annual basis beginning June 30, 2027, containing diversity data provided by the applicants. The report shall contain, in the aggregate and per project, an assessment of whether the diversity workplan goals required by this section were met for qualified motion pictures that submitted the final assessment to the California Film Commission in the prior fiscal year. The assessment shall contain an account of diversity workplans submitted, interim assessments submitted, and final assessments submitted, as well as which categories of the
 diversity workplan checklist established pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) were included. In the event that a report is required pursuant to paragraph (9) of subdivision (g) of Section 17053.98 and Section 23698 in the same year as a report is required under this paragraph, the reports may be combined into one report. The California Film Commission shall submit each such assessment to the Legislature in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(10) (A) The California Film Commission shall expand the number of nonprofit organizations that partner with the Career Pathways program to build upon their ongoing efforts to provide access to the widest cross section of Californians, including historically disadvantaged and underrepresented individuals seeking training and employment opportunities in motion picture and television production.

(B) (i) The California Film Commission shall establish an application process for career-based nonprofit organizations to obtain approval as a Career Pathways Program.

(ii) The application shall be submitted to the California Film Commission’s fiscal agent during a request for proposal process initiated by the fiscal agent.

(iii) The first request for proposal process shall be initiated by the California Film Commission or its fiscal agent prior to the first allocation of credits allowed under this section.

(iv) The second request for proposal process shall be initiated by the California Film Commission or its fiscal agent as needed in response to changes in program revenue or training partners, but no later than July 1, 2027.

(v) Subsequent request for proposal processes shall be initiated by the California Film Commission or its fiscal agent as the commission deems necessary.

(C) The California Film Commission shall approve Career Pathways programs. Career Pathways programs shall meet all of the following requirements:

(i) Be conducted by a nonprofit organization that has an established record of training and job placement in the entertainment industry.

(ii) Be focused on training individuals 18 years or older from traditionally underserved communities.

(iii) Offer training courses focused on one or more of the following:

(I) Skilled, technical positions that would be eligible for qualified wages
 if performed on a qualified motion picture.

(II) Administrative- and industry-related technical occupations.

(III) Soft skills training for the motion picture industry.

(iv) Meet minimum qualifications and standards for high-quality, skill-based training programs, as determined by the California Film Commission through regulations and in consultation with stakeholders.

(D) To ensure the Career Pathways Program is successful and has a meaningful impact, the California Film Commission and its fiscal agent shall, in addition to the requirements specified in subparagraph (C), consider the following aspects when evaluating applications:

(i) Availability of participants.

(ii) Fiscal agent administrative resources.

(iii) Overlap with the focus areas of currently approved organizations, including, but not limited to, industry role focus and student outreach focus.

(iv) Specific industry labor needs, as determined by the fiscal agent and based on information provided by industry and labor stakeholders.

(E) Before July 1, 2026, the California Film Commission shall develop criteria to incentivize supplemental placement of 1 to 4 trainees from the Career Pathways Program per qualified production. The placement of the trainees shall not displace otherwise anticipated or necessary hiring of experienced employees. Trainee wages shall be excluded from a production’s qualified wages for purposes of the jobs ratio and incentive
 calculation.

(11) Beginning January 1, 2025, the California Film Commission shall collect information to the extent available and based on data provided by the Career Pathways Training program, about the breakdown of spending by the Career Pathways Program, how participation in the Career Pathways Program by both program partners and participants has changed in comparison to prior years, whether graduates of the program are accessing jobs in the film industry upon completion of the program, what projects the students have worked on, whether those projects received a tax credit, whether students are employed in California or another state, and the aggregated self-reported and voluntarily provided ethnic, racial, gender, disability status, veteran status, and ZIP Code of those individuals. The California Film Commission shall report to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, and publish on its internet website an
 annual report about the Career Pathways Training program, with the above information. Such information shall be reported for participants for five years following a participant’s completion of the Career Pathways Training program, to the extent the information is available. This paragraph shall be applicable consistent with federal and state law.

(h) (1) The California Film Commission shall annually provide the Legislative Analyst’s Office, the Franchise Tax Board, and the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration with a list of qualified taxpayers and the tax credit amounts allocated to each qualified taxpayer by the California Film Commission. The list shall include the names and taxpayer identification numbers, including taxpayer identification numbers of each partner or shareholder, as applicable, of the qualified taxpayer.

(2) (A) Notwithstanding paragraph (6) of subdivision (g), the California Film Commission shall annually post on its internet website and make available for public release all of the following:

(i) A table which includes all of the following information: a list of qualified taxpayers and the tax credit amounts allocated to each qualified taxpayer by the California Film Commission, the number of production days in California the qualified taxpayer represented in its application would occur, the number of California jobs that the qualified taxpayer represented in its application would be directly created by the production, and the total amount of qualified expenditures expected to be spent by the production.

(ii) A narrative staff summary describing the production of the qualified taxpayer as well as background information regarding the qualified taxpayer contained in the
 qualified taxpayer’s application for the credit.

(iii) The diversity report submitted annually to the Legislature described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) organized per production and an aggregate compilation describing the voluntary programs collected pursuant to clause (xiii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g).

(B) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to make the information submitted by an applicant for a tax credit under this section a public record, including for the purposes of the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(3) The California Film Commission shall provide each city and county in California with an instructional guide that includes, but is not limited to, a review of best practices for
 facilitating motion picture production in local jurisdictions, resources on hosting and encouraging motion picture production, and the California Film Commission’s Model Filming Ordinance. The California Film Commission shall maintain on its internet website a list of initiatives by locality that encourage motion picture production in regions across the state. The list shall be distributed to each approved applicant for the program to highlight local jurisdictions that offer incentives to facilitate film production.

(i) (1) (A) The aggregate amount of credits that may be allocated for a fiscal year pursuant to this section and Section 17053.98.1, except as provided in subdivision (k) of Section 23698 and subdivision (k) of Section 17053.98, is seven hundred fifty million dollars ($750,000,000), plus any amount described in subparagraph (B), (C), (D), or (E) in credits for the 2025–26 fiscal year and
 each fiscal year thereafter, through and including the 2029–30 fiscal year, except as provided in paragraph (7) of subdivision (g).

(B) (i) Subject to clauses (ii) and (iii), the unused allocation credit amount, if any, for the preceding fiscal year.

(ii) The amount of unused credit allocation attributable to independent films shall only be allocated according to clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2).

(iii) The total amount of any unused credit allocation amount that is remaining shall only be allocated pursuant to clause (iv) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2).

(C) The amount of previously allocated credits not certified.

(D) The amount of any credits
 reduced pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d).

(E) That portion of any unused allocation credit amount, if any, attributable to Section 17053.85, 17053.95, 17053.98, 23685, 23695, or 23698 available for that fiscal year in a manner as determined by regulations promulgated by the California Film Commission.

(2) (A) Notwithstanding the foregoing, and subject to paragraph (4) of this subdivision and changes in allocations pursuant to clause (v) of subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g), the California Film Commission shall allocate the credit amounts subject to the following categories, but shall have discretion to reallocate up to 30 percent of the funds within any category amongst the remaining categories to maximize the amount of total credits allocated:

(i) Independent
 films with qualified expenditures of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) or less shall be allocated 5 percent of the amount specified in paragraph (1). Independent films with qualified expenditures in excess of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) shall be allocated 5 percent of the amount specified in paragraph (1). These amounts shall be in addition to any unused allocation credit amount, if any, for the preceding fiscal year as described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1).

(ii) Features and animated films shall be allocated 35 percent of the amount specified in paragraph (1).

(iii) A relocating television series shall be allocated 15 percent of the amount specified in paragraph (1).

(iv) A television series described in clause (ii), (v), (vi), or (viii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (19) of subdivision (b) and a
 recurring television series shall be allocated 40 percent of the amount specified in paragraph (1), plus any unused allocation credit amount, if any, for the preceding fiscal year as described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1).

(B) Within any allocation period for credits to a relocating television series, any unused amount shall be reallocated to the category described in clause (iv) of subparagraph (A) and, if any unused amount remains, reallocated in the next allocation period for credits to a relocating television series.

(C) With respect to a relocating television series issued a credit in a subsequent year pursuant to clause (v) of subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g), that subsequent credit amount shall be allowed from the allocation amount described in clause (iv) of subparagraph (A).

(3) Any act that reduces the amount that may be allocated pursuant to paragraph (1) constitutes a change in state taxes for the purpose of increasing revenues within the meaning of Section 3 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution and may be passed by not less than two-thirds of all Members elected to each of the two houses of the Legislature.

(4) A qualified motion picture, as defined in subdivision (k) of Sections 17053.98 and 23698, shall not be eligible for an allocation under subdivisions (a) to (j), inclusive, if it receives a credit under subdivision (k) of Section 17053.98 or Section 23698 during that fiscal year.

(j) The California Film Commission shall have the authority to allocate tax credits in accordance with this section and in accordance with any regulations prescribed pursuant to subdivision (e) upon adoption.

(k) (1) A qualified taxpayer may make a one-time election to be paid a refund for each taxable year of the refundable period, not to exceed the annual refundable amount.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, the following definitions shall apply:

(A) “Annual refundable amount” means 50 percent, rounded to the nearest cent, of the total refundable amount.

(B) (i) “Credit amount” means the credit amount specified in the credit certificate issued to the qualified taxpayer by the California Film Commission pursuant to subdivision (g).

(ii) In the case of a pass-thru entity, the “credit amount” means the pro rata share or distributive share of the credit passed through to the partner or shareholder of the qualified taxpayer. For purposes of this clause, the term “pass-thru entity” means any partnership, “S” corporation, or limited liability company treated as a partnership.

(iii) In the case of an assigned
 credit, the “credit amount” means the credit amount that was assigned to the taxpayer.

(C) “Refundable period” means the first taxable year that the credit certificate is issued to the qualified taxpayer by the California Film Commission pursuant to subdivision (g), and the succeeding taxable year.

(D) “Total refundable amount” means 95 percent of the credit amount that exceeds the “tax” in the first taxable year of the refundable period.

(3) The refund shall be computed as follows:

(A) (i) In the first taxable year of the refundable period, the credit amount shall be allowed against the “tax” computed under this part for the taxable year.

(ii) If the credit allowed by this section exceeds the “tax” in the first taxable year of the refundable period, the annual refundable amount shall be refunded to the qualified taxpayer.

(B) (i) In the taxable year after the first taxable year of the refundable period, the annual refundable amount shall be allowed as a credit against the “tax” computed under this part for the taxable year, and the excess, if any, shall be refunded to the qualified taxpayer.

(ii) If the qualified taxpayer’s tax liability for the taxable year exceeds the annual refundable amount, only the annual refundable amount shall be allowed as a credit against the qualified taxpayer’s “tax.”

(4) (A) In the first taxable year of the refundable period, the total refundable amount, less the annual refundable amount, shall be carried over to the succeeding taxable year.

(B) In each taxable year other than the first taxable year of the refundable period, the total refundable amount, less the annual refundable amount allowed as a credit against the qualified taxpayer’s “tax” or refunded in the current and prior taxable years in the refundable period, shall be carried over to the next succeeding year of the refundable period.

(C) Notwithstanding paragraph (3) of subdivision (c), if an election is made pursuant to this subdivision, no amount of credit shall be allowed after the refundable period.

(5) Any refund pursuant to this subdivision shall be credited against other amounts due, if any, and the balance, if any, shall be paid from the Tax Relief and Refund Account and refunded to the qualified taxpayer upon their election.

(6) An election made pursuant to this
 subdivision shall be irrevocable and shall be made on an original, timely filed return required under Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) for the taxable year that the credit certificate is issued in the form and manner as prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(7) A taxpayer that purchases a credit pursuant to subdivision (c) cannot elect to be paid a refund pursuant to this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 344, Sec. 10.   (SB 186)   Effective September 19, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

23698.3.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 23698, a qualified motion picture filmed on a soundstage that is, or is part of, a certified studio construction project, leased by a qualified taxpayer on or before September 1, 2026, for the purposes of filming a qualified motion picture, that subsequently became unavailable for filming because that soundstage was the subject of a qualified sublease, is deemed to be filmed at a certified studio construction project for any season the production period overlaps in whole or in part with the term of the qualified sublease if the filming occurs at a qualified alternative soundstage.

(b) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Certified studio construction project” has the same meaning as provided in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (k) of Section 23698.

(2) “Qualified alternative soundstage” means any soundstage or soundstages in California utilized by a production during the term of a qualified sublease.

(3) “Qualified sublease” means a sublease of a soundstage that is, or is part of, a certified studio construction project to any organization directly associated with, as determined by the California Film Commission, the Los Angeles 2028 Olympic and Paralympic Games, including, but not limited to, LA28, the United States Olympic and Paralympic Committee, and the International Olympic Committee.

(c) A qualified taxpayer or applicant shall submit evidence of a qualified sublease to the California Film
 Commission. The California Film Commission has sole discretion to determine that a qualified motion picture is considered filmed at a certified studio construction project, for purposes of this section, for any season the production period overlaps in whole or in part with the term of the qualified sublease.

(d) A television series that films subsequent seasons at the qualified alternative soundstage after the term of the qualified sublease shall continue to be deemed to be produced at a certified studio construction project pursuant to this section. However, during the period after the term of the qualified sublease, if the qualified taxpayer or applicant for that television series earns tax credits pursuant to this section for production of the television series produced at the qualified alternative soundstage, then the equivalent number of soundstages at the previously unavailable certified studio construction project may not be treated as
 part of a certified studio construction project until the television series that films subsequent seasons at the qualified alternative soundstage ceases to claim the benefit of being produced at a qualified alternative soundstage project.

(e) Any soundstages that are, or are part of, a certified studio construction project shall receive an extension of certification equal to the amount of time of the qualified sublease, beyond the five-year certification in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (k) of Section 23698.

(f) A qualified taxpayer or applicant filming on a qualified alternative soundstage, for purposes of this section, shall comply with all of the requirements of subdivision (k) of Section 23698 on the qualified alternative soundstage instead of on a certified studio construction project, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (k) of
 Section 23698.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 354, Sec. 11.   (AB 191)   Effective September 20, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Exempt Corporations [23701. - 23778.]



  ARTICLE 1. Exemptions From This Part [23701. - 23712.]

23701.

(a) Organizations which are organized and operated for nonprofit purposes within the provisions of a specific section of this article, or are defined in Section 23701h (relating to certain title-holding companies) or Section 23701x (relating to certain title-holding companies), are exempt from taxes imposed under this part, except as provided in this article or in Article 2 (commencing with Section 23731) of this chapter if both of the following occur:

(1) An application for exemption is submitted in the form prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(2) The Franchise Tax Board issues a determination exempting the
 organization from tax.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), an organization organized and operated for nonprofit purposes in accordance with Section 23701a, 23701d, 23701e, 23701f, 23701g, or 23701w shall be exempt from taxes imposed by this part, except as provided in this article or in Article 2 (commencing with Section 23731), upon its submission to the Franchise Tax Board of one of the following:

(A) A copy of the determination letter or ruling issued by the Internal Revenue Service recognizing the organization’s exemption from federal income tax under Section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, as an organization described in Section 501(c)(3), (c)(4), (c)(5), (c)(6), (c)(7), or (c)(19) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(B) A copy of the group exemption letter issued by the Internal Revenue Service that states that both the central organization and all of its subordinates are tax-exempt under Section 501(c)(3), (c)(4), (c)(5), (c)(6), (c)(7), or (c)(19) of the Internal Revenue Code and substantiation that the organization is included in the federal group exemption letter as a subordinate organization.

(2) (A) Upon receipt of the documents required in subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (1), the Franchise Tax Board shall issue an acknowledgment that the organization is exempt from taxes imposed by this part, except as provided in this article or in Article 2 (commencing with Section 23731). The acknowledgment may refer to the organization’s recognition by the Internal Revenue Service
 of exemption from federal income tax as an organization described in Section 501(c)(3), (c)(4), (c)(5), (c)(6), (c)(7), or (c)(19) of the Internal Revenue Code and, if applicable, the organization’s subordinate organization status under a federal group exemption letter. The effective date of an organization’s exemption from state income tax pursuant to this subdivision shall be no later than the effective date of the organization’s recognition of exemption from federal income tax as an organization described in Section 501(c)(3), (c)(4), (c)(5), (c)(6), (c)(7), or (c)(19) of the Internal Revenue Code, or its status as a subordinate organization under a federal group exemption letter, as applicable.

(B) Notwithstanding any other provision of this subdivision, an organization formed as a California corporation or qualified to do business in